da: Kravestil: Kravefri V-udskæring; Reverskrave; Mandarinkrave; Hakket revers; Sjalskrave; Ståkrave; Andet
el: Στυλ κολάρου: V-neck χωρίς γιακά; Γιακάς με πέτο; Γιακάς μάο; Πέτο με εγκοπή; Γιακάς τύπου σάλι; Όρθιος γιακάς; Άλλο
zh-TW: 衣領款式: 無領 V 領; 翻領; 立領 / 旗袍領; 缺角翻領; 披肩領; 立領; 其他
ko: 칼라 스타일: 노카라 V넥; 라펠 카라; 만다린 카라; 노치드 라펠; 숄 카라; 스탠드 카라; 기타
pl: Styl kołnierza: Bez kołnierzyka (dekolt w serek); Z klapami; Kołnierz mandaryński; Klapy otwarte; Kołnierz szalowy; Stójka; Inny
de: Kragenstil: Kragenloser V-Ausschnitt; Reverskragen; Mandarinkragen; Fallendes Revers; Schalkragen; Stehkragen; Andere
es: Tipo de cuello: Escote en V sin cuello; Cuello con solapa; Cuello mandarín; Solapa de muesca; Cuello chal; Cuello alzado; Otro
bg-BG: Стил на яката: Без яка, V-образно деколте; Яка с ревери; Яка тип мандарин; Назъбен ревер; Шалова яка; Изправена яка; Други
pt-PT: Estilo de gola: Decote em V sem colarinho; Gola de lapela; Gola mandarim; Lapela recortada; Gola de xaile; Gola subida; Outra
zh-CN: 领型: 无领 V 领; 翻领; 立领; 平驳领; 青果领; 立领; 其他
vi: Kiểu cổ áo: Cổ chữ V không bâu; Cổ ve; Cổ trụ; Cổ ve chữ V; Cổ sam; Cổ đứng; Khác
fi: Kaulustyyli: Kaulukseton V-aukko; Käännekaulus; Mandariinikaulus; Lovikäännekaulus; Shaalikaulus; Pystykaulus; Muu
tr: Yaka stili: Yakasız V yaka; Klapa yaka; Hakim yaka; Çentikli yaka; Şal yaka; Dik yaka; Diğer
it: Stile del colletto: Scollo a V senza colletto; Colletto con revers; Colletto alla coreana; Revers classico; Collo a scialle; Collo alto; Altro
pt-BR: Estilo da gola: Decote V sem colarinho; Gola com lapela; Gola padre; Lapela chanfrada; Gola xale; Gola alta; Outros
sv: Kragstil: Kraglös V-ringning; Krage med slag; Kinakrage; Trubbiga slag; Sjalkrage; Ståkrage; Övrigt
nl: Kraagstijl: Kraagloze V-hals; Reverskraag; Mandarijnkraag; Ingesneden revers; Sjaalkraag; Opstaande kraag; Overig
hr-HR: Stil ovratnika: V-izrez bez ovratnika; Ovratnik s reverom; Ruska kragna; Rever s urezom; Šal-ovratnik; Podignuti ovratnik; Ostalo
en: Collar style: Collarless V-neck; Lapel collar; Mandarin collar; Notched lapel; Shawl collar; Stand collar; Other
fr: Style de col: Encolure en V sans col; Col à revers; Col mao; Revers cranté; Col châle; Col montant; Autre
sk-SK: Štýl prstenca: Výstrih do V (bez goliera); Golier s chlopňami; Stojačik (mandarínsky golier); Zúbkovaná chlopňa; Šálový golier; Stojatý golier (stojačik); Iné
hu: Gallér stílusa: Gallér nélküli V-nyakú; Hajtókás gallér; Mandaringallér; Bevágott hajtóka; Sálgallér; Állógallér; Egyéb
sl-SI: Slog ovratnika: Brez ovratnika, V-izrez; Ovratnik z reverji; Ruski ovratnik; Zobčast rever; Šal ovratnik; Stoječ ovratnik; Drugo
ru: Стиль воротника: Без воротника, V-образный вырез; Воротник с лацканами; Воротник-стойка (Мандарин); Лацкан с вырезом (английский воротник); Воротник-шалька; Воротник-стойка; Другой
ro-RO: Stilul gulerului: Decolteu în V fără guler; Guler cu rever; Guler tip mandarin; Rever crestat; Guler șal; Guler tunică; Altele
th: รูปแบบปกเสื้อ: คอวีไร้ปก; ปกพับ; คอจีน; ปกป้าน; ปกกล้วย; คอตั้ง; อื่นๆ
cs: Styl límce: Výstřih do V bez límce; Límec s klopami; Stojáček (mandarin); Zoubkovaná klopa; Šálový límec; Stojatý límec; Jiný
ja: カラースタイル: ノーカラーVネック; ラペルカラー; マンダリンカラー; ノッチドラペル; ショールカラー; スタンドカラー; その他
lt-LT: Apykaklės stilius: Be apykaklės, V formos iškirptė; Atvartinė apykaklė; „Mandarin“ stiliaus apykaklė; Įkirstas atvartas; Skaros tipo apykaklė; Stati apykaklė; Kita
nb: Kragestil: Krageløs V-hals; Slagkrage; Mandarinkrage; Innskåret slag; Sjalkrage; Ståkrage; Annet